Utah statutes.
58-24b-201.   Physical Therapy Licensing Board -- Creation -- Membership --
Duties.
(1)  There is created the Physical Therapy Licensing Board, consisting of
three licensed physical therapists, one physical therapist assistant, and one
member of the general public.
(2)  Members of the board shall be appointed and serve in accordance with
Section 58-1-201.
(3)  The duties and responsibilities of the board are described in Subsection
(4) and Sections 58-1-201 through 58-1-203.
(4)  The board shall designate a member of the board, on a permanent or
rotating basis, to:
(a)  assist the division in reviewing complaints of unlawful or unprofessional
conduct of a licensee; and
(b)  advise the division during the division's investigation of the complaints
described in Subsection (4)(a).
(5)  A board member who has reviewed a complaint or been involved in an
investigation under Subsection (4) is disqualified from participating in an
adjudicative proceeding relating to the complaint or investigation.
